Massachusetts, session 194th, H2992.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subject to the approval of the town administrator of the Town of Brookline,
the Chief of Police of the town of Brookline may appoint retired Brookline police officers as
special police officers for the purpose of performing police details or any police duties arising
from police details or during the course of police detail work, whether or not related to the detail
work. The retired police officers shall have been regular Brookline police officers and have been
retired based on superannuation. A retired police officer shall not be appointed under this act as a
special police officer if the officer has been retired for more than 5 years. A special police officer
appointed under this act shall not be subject to the same maximum age restrictions applied to
regular Brookline police officers under chapter 32 of the General Laws; provided, however, that
a special police officer shall not be able to serve if the special police officer has reached the age
of 70. Prior to performing police details, a special police officer appointed under this act shall
of 3

pass a medical examination by a physician or other certified professional chosen or agreed to by
the department to determine that the retired police officer is capable of performing the essential
duties of a special police officer, the cost of which shall be borne by the special police officer.
SECTION 2. A special police officer appointed under this act shall not be subject to
chapter 31 of the General Laws, section 99A of chapter 41 of the General Laws, chapter 150E of
the General Laws or chapter 151A of the General Laws.
SECTION 3. A special police officer appointed under this act shall, when performing the
duties under section 1, have the same power to make arrests and perform other police functions
as regular police officers in the town of Brookline.
SECTION 4. A special police officer appointed under this act shall be appointed for an
indefinite term, subject to suspension or removal by the chief of police with approval by the
town administrator at any time. A special police officer shall be provided 14 calendar days
written notice prior to a permanent removal.
SECTION 5. A special police officer appointed under this act shall be subject to the
rules, regulations, policies, procedures and requirements of the chief of police including, but not
limited to:
(i) restrictions on the type of detail assignments; (ii) requirements regarding medical
examinations to determine continuing capability to perform the duties of a special police officer;
(iii) requirements for training; (iv) requirements for firearms licensing and qualifications; (v)
requirements for maintaining a medical insurance policy; (vi) and requirements regarding
uniforms and equipment. A special police officers shall not be subject to section 96B of chapter
of 3

41 of the General Laws. The cost of all training, uniforms, and equipment shall be borne by the
special police officer.
SECTION 6. Special police officers appointed under this act shall be sworn before the
town clerk of the town of Brookline who shall keep a record of all such appointments.
SECTION 7. Sections 100 and 111F of chapter 41 of the General Laws shall not apply to
a special police officer appointed under this act. A special police officer appointed under this act
shall not be subject to section 85h or 85h ½ of chapter 32 of the General Laws nor eligible for
any benefits pursuant thereto.
SECTION 8. Appointment as a special police officer under this act shall not entitle the
appointee to any assignment to any detail.
SECTION 9. A retired Brookline police officer serving as a special police officer under
this act shall be subject to the limitations on hours worked and on payments to retired town
employees under paragraph (b) of section 91 of chapter 32 of the General Laws.
SECTION 10. This act shall take effect upon its passage, or act on anything relative
thereto.
of 3